Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1422
Sections, supplemental to other provisions.

Sections 70-1401 to 70-1421 shall be deemed to provide an additional, alternative, and complete method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be deemed and construed to be supplemental and additional to powers conferred by existing laws, and shall not be regarded as in degradation of any powers not existing, except that insofar as provisions of sections 70-1401 to 70-1423 are inconsistent with the provisions of any other special or local law, the provisions of sections 70-1401 to 70-1423 shall be controlling. Nothing in sections 70-1401 to 70-1423 shall be construed to authorize the issuance of the bonds for the purpose of financing facilities to be owned wholly or in part by any private corporation.

Laws 1982, LB 852, § 22.